utilities/dictionaries/hy_HY-Armenian.aff
FLAG long
# locative
SFX LO Y 5
SFX LO 	0	ում/DE	.
SFX LO 	0	ումս	.
SFX LO 	0	ումդ	.
SFX LO 	0	ումն	.
SFX LO 	0	ումը	.

# locative  եկեղեցում
SFX L2 Y 1
SFX L2 	ի	ում/DE	.

# locative  with vowel reduction
SFX LX Y 55
SFX LX  իկ	կում/DE .
SFX LX  ուկ	կում/DE .
SFX LX  ումբ		մբում/DE .
SFX LX  ունդ		նդում/DE .
SFX LX  ուրդ	րդում/DE .
SFX LX  իզբ	զբում/DE .
SFX LX  իթ		թում/DE .
SFX LX  ուզ	զում/DE  .
SFX LX  ուղթ	ղթում/DE  .
SFX LX իժ		ժում/DE  .
SFX LX իծ		ծում/DE .
SFX LX ուծ		ծում/DE .
SFX LX ուխ		խում/DE  .
SFX LX ունկ		նկում/DE . 
SFX LX ունձ		նձում/DE .
SFX LX ուրձ		րձում/DE .
SFX LX ինձ		նձում/DE .
SFX LX իղ		ղում/DE .
SFX LX իճ		ճում/DE .
SFX LX ին		նում/DE .
SFX LX ուն		նում/DE .
SFX LX իշ		շում/DE .
SFX LX ուշ		շում/DE .
SFX LX ինչ		նչում/DE .
SFX LX ունչ		նչում/DE .
SFX LX ինջ		նջում/DE .
SFX LX ունջ		նջում/DE .
SFX LX իսպ		սպում/DE .
SFX LX իս		սում/DE .
SFX LX ուրջ		րջում/DE  .
SFX LX իչ		չում/DE .
SFX LX իջ		ջում/DE .
SFX LX իռ		ռում/DE .
SFX LX ուռ		ռում/DE .
SFX LX իտ		տում/DE .
SFX LX ուտ		տում/DE .
SFX LX իվ		վում/DE .
SFX LX իր		րում/DE .
SFX LX ուր		րում/DE .
SFX LX իշտ		շտում/DE .
SFX LX իշտ		ստում/DE .
SFX LX ուշտ		շտում/DE .
SFX LX իրտ		րտում/DE .
SFX LX ուրտ		րտում/DE .
SFX LX ից		ցում/DE .
SFX LX ուց		ցում/DE .
SFX LX իտք		տքում/DE .
SFX LX ուտք		տքում/DE .
SFX LX իրք		րքում/DE .
SFX LX ինք		նքում/DE .
SFX LX ինդ		նդում/DE .
SFX LX ուփ		փում/DE .
SFX LX ուք		քում/DE .
SFX LX եջ		իջում/DE . 
SFX LX դուռ		դռնում/DE  .

# ayi, oyi
SFX L4 Y 2
SFX L4  ա	այում/DE	.
SFX L4  ո	ոյում/DE

#present
SFX	VA	Y 25
SFX	VA	լ	մ/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	լ	ս/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ել	ի/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ալ	ա/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	լ	նք/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ալ	աք/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ել	եք/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	լ	ն/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ել	եի/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ել	եիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ել	եր/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ել	եինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ել	եիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ել	եին/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ալ	այի/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ալ	այիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ալ	ար/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ալ	այինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ալ	այիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	ալ	ային/CHGU	.
SFX	VA	լ	լիս	.
SFX	VA	լ	լիք/CHDEGEABINLOPP	.
SFX	VA	լ	լի/CHDEGEABINLOPP	.
SFX	VA	ել	ում	.
SFX	VA	ալ	ում	.

# ալ - ել  verb class specific
SFX	VB	Y 	117
SFX	VB	ել	ող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ել	ողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ել	ած/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ել	ածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացած/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ել	վող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	լ	ցվող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ել	վողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	լ	ցվողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ել	ված/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	ել	վածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	լ	ցված/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	լ	ցվածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	լ	ցնող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	լ	ցնողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	լ	ցրած/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VB	լ	ցրածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .	
SFX	VB	ալ	ացել .
SFX	VB	ել	եցվել/CHG2A2INLODE .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացվել/CHG2A2INLODE .	
SFX	VB	ել	եցրել .	
SFX	VB	ալ	ացրել .
SFX	VB	ել	իր .	
SFX	VB	ալ	ա .
SFX	VB	ել	եցեք .	
SFX	VB	ալ	ացեք .
SFX	VB	ել	վիր .	
SFX	VB	լ	ցվիր .
SFX	VB	ել	վեցեք .	
SFX	VB	ալ	ացվեցեք .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացրեք .
SFX	VB	ել	եցրու .	
SFX	VB	ալ	ացրու .
SFX	VB	ել	եցրեք .	
SFX	VB	ալ	ացրեցեք .
SFX	VB	ալ	ացրեք .
SFX	VB	լ	ցնել/CHG2A2INLODE	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցներ	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնեմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնես/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնի/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնենք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնեք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնեն/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնեի/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնեիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցներ/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնեինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնեիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնեին/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրեցի/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրեցիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրեց/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրեցինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրեցիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրեցին/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրի/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցրին/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնելիս	.
SFX	VB	ել	վելիս	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվելիս	.
SFX	VB	լ	լիս	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվում	.
SFX	VB	ել	վում	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցնում	.
SFX	VB	լ	ր	.
SFX	VB	ել	վել/CHG2A2INLODE	.
SFX	VB	ել	վեմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	վես/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	վի/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	վենք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	վեք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	վեն/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեր .
SFX	VB	լ	ցվել/CHG2A2INLODE	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվես/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվի/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվենք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեն/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	վեի/CHG2A2INLODE	.
SFX	VB	ել	վեիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	վեր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	վեինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	վեիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	ել	վեին/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեի/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեր/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեին/CHGU	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցի/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցիր/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ց/CH .
SFX	VB	լ	ցինք/CH .
SFX	VB	լ	ցիք/CH .
SFX	VB	լ	ցին/CH .
SFX	VB	ել	վեցի/CH	.
SFX	VB	ել	վեցիր/CH	.
SFX	VB	ել	վեց/CH .
SFX	VB	ել	վեցինք/CH .
SFX	VB	ել	վեցիք/CH .
SFX	VB	ել	վեցին/CH .
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեցի/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեցիր/CH	.
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեց/CH .
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեցինք/CH .
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեցիք/CH .
SFX	VB	լ	ցվեցին/CH .


#nal ուշացա մոտեցա
SFX	VC	Y	86
SFX	VC	նալ	ցա/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցար/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցավ/CH .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցանք/CH .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցաք/CH .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցան/CH .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվել/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվես/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվի/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվենք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեն/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցած/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցված/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնող/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնողներ/CHDEABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրած/CHDEPPABGEINLO .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրածներ/CHDEABGEINLO .	
SFX	VC	նալ	ցել .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվել/CHG2A2INLODE .	
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրել .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցիր .	
SFX	VC	նալ	նա .	
SFX	VC	նալ	նար .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցեք .	
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվիր .	
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեցեք .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրեք .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրու .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրեցեք .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնել/CHG2A2INLODE	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցներ	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնեմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնես/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնի/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնենք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնեք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնեն/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնեի/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնեիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցներ/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնեինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնեիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնեին/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրեցի/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրեցիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրեց/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրեցինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրեցիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրեցին/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրի/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցրին/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնելիս	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվելիս	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվում	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցնում	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեր .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվել/CHG2A2INLODE	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեմ/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվես/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվի/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվենք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեն/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեի/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեիր/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեր/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեինք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեիք/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեին/CHGU	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեցի/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեցիր/CH	.
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեց/CH .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեցինք/CH .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեցիք/CH .
SFX	VC	նալ	ցվեցին/CH .
