utilities/dictionaries/hy_HY-Armenian.dic
Ազիա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
աղա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
աղապատ/DEABGEINLOPP
ամբաստանագիր/DEAXGXIXLXPM
ամբարշտանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
ամպակալել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
ամպհովանի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
անաշխատունակ/DEABGEINLOPP
անապագա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
անբարոյականանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
անէանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
անխելքանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
Անկարա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
անհաճելի/DEABGEINLOPP
անմակագիր/DEAXGXIXLXPP
Անմահանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
անվերապահություն/DEABG1I1INLOPP
անտառանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
ապասերվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
ապարանցի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
ապուշանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
առափնյա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
առաքելադիր/DEAXGXIXLXPP
առլծել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
ասպատակվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
Արա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
արագանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
արգելափակել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
արդյունաբեր/DEABGEINLO
արհեստակից/DEAXGXIXLXPP
արմավենի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
արտոնագրվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
արքայախնձոր/DEABGEINLOPP
բաղադիր/DEAXGXIXLXPP
բամփաչել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
բանանենի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
բավականանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
բարդոց/DEABGEINLOPP
բացել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
բացօդյա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
բյուրեղանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
բողոքագիրք/DEGXAXIXLXPX
բորենի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
բուսապատվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
բռնագանձել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
գանձահատ/DEABGEINLOPP
գառնանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
գեղադեմ/DEAXGXIXLXPP
գեղահմա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
գետնամորի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
գիջանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
գլդորել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
գյուղխորհուրդ/DEPPAXGXIXLX
գոնջանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
գովերգվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
գրկաչափ/DEABGEINLOPP
դառնահոգի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
դասախոսել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
դատաստանատուն/DEGDAXLXIXPX
դեղնանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
դժոխամեքենա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
դյուրընտել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
եզերագիծ/DEPXAXGXIXLX
եթովպացի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
եթովպերեն/DEABGEINLOPP
Եղիա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
եղջերանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
ենթավարձել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
երկաչքանի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
երկնածին/DEAXGXIXLXPP
երուսաղեմցի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
Զախարովա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
զխկել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
Զորոյան/DEABGEINLOPP
զույգել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
էքսկուրսիա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
ընդարմանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
թանձրագլուխ/DEPPAXGXIXLX
թերասնել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
թեւաբախել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
թեւոտանի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
թույր/DEABGEINLOPM
ժանտախորհուրդ/DEPPAXGXIXLX
Ժվանիա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
իսլամանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
իսլամացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
իտալուհի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
իտերացիա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
լծակակից/DEAXGXIXLXPP
լկրտվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
լորի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
լուսազուրկ/DEABGEINLO
լուսատեխնիկա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
խառանչել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
խեղճանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
խմբավորել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
խնդադեմ/DEAXGXIXLXPP
խորասուզվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
խռիվ/DEABGEINLOPP
խրամուղի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
ծանուցվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
ծանրախորհուրդ/DEPPAXGXIXLX
ծլկվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
ծնկանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
կաղնեսունկ/DEPXAXGXIXLX
կաղնի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
կանխահոժար/DEABGEINLO
կապա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
կապել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
կապկապել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
կիսադեմ/DEAXGXIXLXPP
կղբենի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
կղմինդրյա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
կոթողանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
կոխել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
կողպ/DEABGEINLOPM
կոնձկոնձալ/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
կրիա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
կցագունդ/DEPXAXGXIXLX
հագարացի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
հակագրոհել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
համարձակել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
համոզել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
հանձնառագիր/DEAXGXIXLXPM
հանրակողմանի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
հաշմանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
հասարակացվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
հեռագիր/DEAXGXIXLXPM
հեռախոսել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
հեռածավալ/DEABGEINLOPP
հիմա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
հիմնվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
հնամենի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
հնանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
հորդաջուր/DEGXAXIXLXPX
ձգափոկ/DEABGEINLOPM
ձերբազատել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
ձիթենի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
ձիթոտել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
ճեպագիր/DEAXGXIXLXPP
Մալգա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
մանկացնել/CHVAVEDEA2G2INLO
մանրեազրկել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
մատենախոսել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
մարմնանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
մարտիրոսուհի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
մաքրագիր/DEAXGXIXLXPP
Մելքոնովա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
միթիականի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
միջադիր/DEAXGXIXLXPP
մոգել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
մուրաբա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
մռնչալ/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
յոթդռնանի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
նախավաճառել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
նանրանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
նեղագիծ/DEPXAXGXIXLX
նյութվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
Նորայր/DEABGEINLOPP
նորվեգուհի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
շաբաթօրյա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
շարադրել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
շնչավորվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
շքեղանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
ոսկեճաճանչ/DEABGEINLOPP
ոսկեջրել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
որդեգրուհի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
ութսունինը/DEAXGXIXLXPX
ուժգնել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
չարաչարա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
չարոգի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
չվառանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
պաղեցուցիչ/DEABGEINLOPP
պանծացվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
պապակվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
պարզասիրտ/DEAXGXIXLXPX
պարընկերուհի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
պշկել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
Պողոսովա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
պտուտկել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
ջարդակոտոր/DEABGEINLO
ջոջանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
ջրուղի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
ռեպրոդուկցիա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
սանձակոծվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
սերատուն/DEGDAXLXIXPX
սերմնավորվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
սեփականազրկվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
Սլովենիա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
սուսերամարտել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
սպիանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
ստրկահոգի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
վաթսունմեկերորդ/DEABGEINLOPP
վայրաբանել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
վարժաթուր/DEGXAXIXLXPX
վեգետացիա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
վերկենալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
վերմղել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
վիճակվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
տասնամարդ/DEG2A2INLO
տավտոլոգիա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
տիգրանակերտցի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
տուրքադրել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
ցոլանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
փառախնդիր/DEAXGXIXLXPP
փառամորուք/DEABGEINLOPP
փեռեկել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
փոխադրվել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
քառօրյա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
քմայնանալ/CHVAVCDEA2G2INLO
քնափոշի/DEA2G2I2L2PP
քչաքանակ/DEABGEINLOPP
օրապահել/CHVAVBDEA2G2INLO
ֆիզիկա/DEA4G4I4L4PP
